Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-956
Treaty; transfer of convicted offenders to foreign countries; Director of Correctional Services; duties.

If a treaty in effect between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer or exchange of convicted offenders to the country of which they are citizens or nationals, the Governor may, on behalf of the state and subject to the terms of the treaty, authorize the Director of Correctional Services to consent to the transfer or exchange of offenders and take any other action necessary to initiate the participation of this state in the treaty.

Laws 1980, LB 808, § 1.